Utah statutes.
62A-3-202.   Definitions.
As used in this part:
(1)  "Elderly resident" means an adult 60 years of age or older who because of
physical, economic, social, or emotional problems cannot function normally on
an independent basis, and who resides in a long-term care facility.
(2)  "Government agency" means any department, division, office, bureau,
board, commission, authority, or any other agency or instrumentality created
by the state, or to which the state is a party, or created by any county or
municipality, which is responsible for the regulation, visitation, inspection,
or supervision of facilities, or which provides services to patients,
residents, or clients of facilities.
(3)  "Long-term care facility" means any skilled nursing facility,
intermediate care facility, nursing home, assisted living facility, adult
foster care home, or any living arrangement in the community through which
room and personal care services are provided for elderly residents.
(4)  "Ombudsman" means the administrator of the long-term care ombudsman
program, created pursuant to Section 62A-3-203.
